Utah, session 2026, SB235.
Section 1. Section 67-22-1 is amended to read:67-22-1. Compensation -- Constitutional offices.(1)(a)The salary for the governor shall be set annually by the Legislature in an appropriations actequal to the salary of the chief justice of the Supreme Court, plus the additional compensation provided to the chief justice under Subsection 78A-3-101(3)(g).(b)Constitutional office salaries shall be based on the following percentages of the salary of the governor:(i)lieutenant governor:90% of the governor's salary;(ii)attorney general:95% of the governor's salary;(iii)state auditor:90% of the governor's salary; and(iv)state treasurer:90% of the governor's salary.(2)The Legislature fixes benefits for the constitutional offices as follows:(a)governor:(i)a vehicle for official and personal use;(ii)housing;(iii)household and security staff;(iv)household expenses;(v)retirement benefits as provided in Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act;(vi)health insurance;(vii)dental insurance;(viii)basic life insurance;(ix)workers' compensation;(x)required employer contribution to Social Security;(xi)long-term disability income insurance; and(xii)the same additional state paid life insurance available to other noncareer service employees; and(b)lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, and state treasurer:(i)a vehicle for official and personal use;(ii)the option of participating in a:(A)state retirement system in accordance with Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act:(I)Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act;(II)Chapter 13, Public Employees' Noncontributory Retirement Act; or(III)Chapter 22, New Public Employees' Tier II Contributory Retirement Act; or(B)deferred compensation plan administered by the State Retirement Office, in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code and its accompanying rules and regulations;(iii)health insurance;(iv)dental insurance;(v)basic life insurance;(vi)workers' compensation;(vii)required employer contribution to Social Security;(viii)long-term disability income insurance; and(ix)the same additional state paid life insurance available to other noncareer service employees.(3)Each constitutional office shall pay the cost of the additional state-paid life insurance for its constitutional officer from its existing budget.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.